Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
Child Welfare Oversight and Advisory Committee

6.943.
Child Welfare Oversight and Advisory Committee — Membership — Co-chairs — Quorum — Employment of personnel — Staff and operating costs. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023]

The Child Welfare Oversight and Advisory Committee of the Kentucky General Assembly is hereby established. The purpose of the committee shall be to review, analyze, and provide oversight to the General Assembly on child welfare within the Commonwealth related but not limited to foster care, adoption, and child abuse, neglect, and dependency.

The Child Welfare Oversight and Advisory Committee shall consist of ten (10) members appointed as follows: three (3) members of the Senate appointed by the President of the Senate; two (2) members of the minority party in the Senate appointed by the Minority Floor Leader in the Senate; three (3) members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; and two (2) members of the minority party in the House of Representatives appointed by the Minority Floor Leader in the House of Representatives. Members appointed from each chamber shall elect one (1) member from their chamber to serve as co-chair.

The co-chairs of the Child Welfare Oversight and Advisory Committee shall have joint responsibilities for committee meeting agendas and presiding at committee meetings. The committee shall meet at least two (2) times annually.

A majority of the entire membership of the Child Welfare Oversight and Advisory Committee shall constitute a quorum, and all actions of the committee shall be by vote of a majority of its entire membership.

The Legislative Research Commission shall have exclusive jurisdiction over the employment of personnel necessary to carry out the provisions of this section. Staff and operating costs of the Child Welfare Oversight and Advisory Committee shall be provided from the budget of the Legislative Research Commission.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 159, § 1, effective July 14, 2018.

6.943.
Child Welfare Oversight and Advisory Committee — Membership — Co-chairs — Quorum — Employment of personnel — Staff and operating costs. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023]

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 159, § 1, effective July 14, 2018; repealed by 2022 ch. 211, § 41, effective January 1, 2023.

6.943.
Child Welfare Oversight and Advisory Committee — Membership — Co-chairs — Quorum — Employment of personnel — Staff and operating costs. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023]

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 159, § 1, effective July 14, 2018; repealed by 2022 ch. 223, § 20, effective January 1, 2023.